Arkansas, session 2025, SB301.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 5-36-101, concerning definitions used in
regard to theft offenses, is amended to add additional subdivisions to read
as follows:
(25)(A) "Cargo" means goods, chattels, money, or baggage that
constitutes, in whole or in part, a commercial shipment of freight moving in
commerce, from any pipeline system, railroad car, motortruck, or other
vehicle, or from any tank or storage facility, station house, platform, or
depot, or from any vessel or wharf, or from any aircraft, air terminal,
airport, aircraft terminal or air navigation facility, or from any intermodal
container, intermodal chassis, trailer, container freight station, warehouse,
freight distribution facility, or freight consolidation facility.
(B) "Cargo" does not include direct-to-consumer goods.
(26) "Moving in commerce" means all points from the point of
origin to the final destination, regardless of any temporary stop while
awaiting transshipment or otherwise.
*CEB192*
02/25/2025 1:17:40 PM CEB192

SB301
SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 5-36-103, concerning theft of property, is
amended to add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(d)(1) A person who commits theft of property under subdivision
(b)(1), (b)(2), or (b)(3) of this section in which the property stolen is
cargo may be subject to an enhanced sentence of an additional term of
imprisonment not to exceed ten (10) years.
(2) To seek the enhanced sentence established in this subsection
(d), a prosecuting attorney shall notify the defendant in writing that the
defendant is subject to the enhanced sentence.
(3) If the defendant is charged by information or indictment,
the prosecuting attorney may include the written notice required under
subdivision (d)(2) of this section in the information or indictment.
(4) An enhanced sentence imposed under this subsection (d) is
consecutive to any other sentence imposed.
(5) A person convicted under this subsection (d) is ineligible
to receive earned release credits for the enhanced portion of the sentence.

SECTION 3. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that theft of goods moving in
commerce is a pervasive problem in the state; that businesses and consumers
suffer the economic consequences of such crimes; and that this act is
immediately necessary to provide a stronger deterrent against this type of
theft and protect the economy of the state. Therefore, an emergency is
declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the
preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective
on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.




02/25/2025 1:17:40 PM CEB192